Illinois, session 104th, SB2797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)8    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 9rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 10of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 11will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 12which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 13hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 14laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 15services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 16office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 17home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 18remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 19health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 20clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 21and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 22for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 23to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this   SB2797- 2 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 2corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of 3a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 4physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 5dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 6a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 7optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 8diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 9services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 10intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 11disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 12disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 13and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 14adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 15assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 16includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 17referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 18instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 19transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 20(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 21in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 22Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 23sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 24discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 25arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 26treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by   SB2797- 3 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 2Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license, 3including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 4treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 5of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 6term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 7care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 8treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 10comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 11purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 12approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 13under the medical assistance program under this Article for 14persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 15Article. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 17reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 18shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 19persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 20under this Article. 21    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 22tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 23Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 24tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 25counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 26through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under   SB2797- 4 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 2eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department 3shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 4federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 5433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 6through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 7limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 8interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 9administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 10developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 11Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1295.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 13understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 14plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 15Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 16Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 17approval.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 19Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 20for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 21physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 22test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 23other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 24documentation. 25    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 26Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department   SB2797- 5 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 2vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals 3enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 4that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 5medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 6managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 7school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 8under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 9individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 10for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 11of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 12the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 13KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 14Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 15payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 16MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 17    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 18and Family Services may provide the following services to 19persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 20participating in education, training or employment programs 21operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 22the Department of Public Aid:23        (1) dental services provided by or under the 24    supervision of a dentist; and 25        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 26    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever   SB2797- 6 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    the person may select.2    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare 3and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 4who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 5assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 6services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 7corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 8the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 9caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 10practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 11supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 12profession.13    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 14set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 15United States District Court for the Northern District of 16Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 17Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 18the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 19than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 20of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 21provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 22assistance program. 23    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 24the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 25deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 26dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in   SB2797- 7 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 2sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall 3remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 4    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 5subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 6allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 7cost to render dental services through an enrolled 8not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 9enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 10assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 11include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 12Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 13Department, through which dental services covered under this 14Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 15process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 16dental services rendered under this provision. 17    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 18Department shall file administrative rules updating the 19Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 20by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 21    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 22and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 23school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 24delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 25to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 26establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers   SB2797- 8 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 2requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual 3published by the Department that establishes the requirements 4for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 5Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 6developing the program requirements to consider the different 7geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 8State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 9provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 10to participate in the school-based dental program administered 11by the Department. 12Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit or 13preempt a home rule unit's or school district's authority to 14establish, change, or administer a school-based dental program 15in addition to, or independent of, the school-based dental 16program administered by the Department. 17    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 18classify the medical services to be provided only in 19accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 205-2. 21    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 22provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 23elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 24diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 25short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 26a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental   SB2797- 9 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1formula is medically necessary. 2    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 3and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 4mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 5individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for 6medical assistance under this Article, as follows:7        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 8    years of age. 9        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 10    age or older.11        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 12    medically necessary by the individual's health care 13    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 14    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 15    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 16    factors.17        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 18    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 19    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 20    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 21    practice medicine in all of its branches. 22        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 23    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 24    all of its branches. 25        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 26    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine   SB2797- 10 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 2    or physician assistant. 3    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 4copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 5coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 6sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 7to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 8health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 9pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 10U.S.C. 223). 11    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 12instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 13frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 14tool.15    For purposes of this Section:16    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 17diagnostic mammography.18    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 19is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 20an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 21subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 22breast.23    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 24breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 25including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 26image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of   SB2797- 11 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 2breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 3includes breast tomosynthesis.4    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 5involves the acquisition of projection images over the 6stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 7three-dimensional images of the breast.8    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 9Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 10agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 11the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 12Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 13would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 14Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 15111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 1618031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 17of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 18paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 19tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 20authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 21U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 22for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 23this paragraph.24    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 25that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department 26include access to at least one breast imaging Center of   SB2797- 12 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 2Radiology.3    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 4quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 5be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 6same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 7increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 8January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 9breast tomosynthesis.10    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 11representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 12facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 13quality standards for mammography.14    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 15breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 16by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 17treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 18program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 19cancer treatment quality program.20    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 21representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 22treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 23doctors, including breast surgeons, reconstructive breast 24surgeons, oncologists, and primary care providers to establish 25quality standards for breast cancer treatment.26    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall   SB2797- 13 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 2qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 3These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 4hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 5Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 6of the provision set forth in this paragraph.7    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 8individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 9but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 10months, of the importance and benefit of screening 11mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 12cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 13reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 14their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 15evaluation.16    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 17primary care providers with respect to their female patients 18over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 19goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 20form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 21who meet that goal.22    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 23patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast 24cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 25program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 26mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program   SB2797- 14 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 2site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 3after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 4include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 5Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 6metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 7be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 8those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 9situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 10    The Department shall require all networks of care to 11develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 12in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 13patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 14Department shall require all networks of care to include 15access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 16academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 17in-network covered benefit.18    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 19for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 20marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 21persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 22approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 23reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for 24persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 25cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 26progression. The Department shall disallow any   SB2797- 15 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 2human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 3    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 4eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 5receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 612-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 7Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 8conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 9the Department.10    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 11recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 12prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 13disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 14referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 15licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 16hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 17The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 18coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 19addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 20Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 21of Human Services. 22    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 23pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information 24from the Department on the availability of services under any 25program providing case management services for addicted 26individuals, including information on appropriate referrals   SB2797- 16 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1for other social services that may be needed by addicted 2individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 3    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 4Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 5of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 6a public awareness campaign, may provide information 7concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 8addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 9directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 10to recipients of medical assistance. 11    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 12nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 13recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 14abuse. 15    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 16governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 17as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 18advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 19the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 20providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 21information dissemination and educational activities for 22medical and health care providers, and consistency in 23procedures to the Illinois Department. 24    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 25Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 26for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code.   SB2797- 17 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 2projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 3represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 4rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 5Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 6require that the sponsor organization be a medical 7organization. 8    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 9medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 10outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 11alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 12necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 13Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 14obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 15medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 16in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 17the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 18        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 19    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 20    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 21    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 22    such services. 23        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate 24    financial incentives to encourage the development of 25    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 26        (3) Persons receiving medical services through   SB2797- 18 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 2    services above the level usually offered through the 3    medical assistance program. 4    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 5qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 6delivery of high quality medical services. These 7qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 8Department and may be higher than qualifications for 9participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 10sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 11for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 12written approval of the Illinois Department. 13    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 14practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 15services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 16choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 17all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 18provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 19certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 20Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 21service providers. 22    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 23States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the 24implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 25    The Illinois Department shall require health care 26providers to maintain records that document the medical care   SB2797- 19 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 2under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 3of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 4provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 5except that if an audit is initiated within the required 6retention period then the records must be retained until the 7audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 8Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 9make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 10the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 11providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 12Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 13medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 14business and professional records sufficient to fully and 15accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 16the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 17assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 18promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 19regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 20prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 21eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 22each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 23such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall 24be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 25such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 26have put into effect and shall be operating a system of   SB2797- 20 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 2basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 3that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 4for which payment is being made are actually being received by 5eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 6(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 7Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 8for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 9medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 10and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 11the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 12updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 13Section 5-5.12. 14    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 15Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 16(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 17procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 18the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 19reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 20procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 21viability of the new system and implement any necessary 22operational or structural changes to its information 23technology platforms in order to allow for the direct 24acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 25    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 26Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15,   SB2797- 21 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b12014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 2procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 3Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 4MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 5purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 6Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 7viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 8operational or structural changes to its information 9technology platforms are implemented. 10    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 11medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 12group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 13Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 14all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 15interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 16associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 17institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 18health care services in this State under this Article. 19    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 20medical services desiring to participate in the medical 21assistance program established under this Article disclose, 22under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 23by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys 24regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 25inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 26liens for the Illinois Department.   SB2797- 22 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 2period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 3period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 4the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 5the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 6Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 7disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 8process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 9penalty. 10    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 11enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 12of the vendor.13    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 14period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 15subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 16the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 17category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 18establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 19which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 20financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 21certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 22unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 23reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other 24screening as required by federal or State law.25    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 26by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for   SB2797- 23 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 2screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 3federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 4the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 5each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 6hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 7of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 8the conditional enrollment period. 9    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 10payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 11resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 12by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 13later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 14medical goods or services were provided, with the following 15exceptions:16        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 17    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 18    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 19    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 20    complete.21        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 22    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 23    which result in an inability to receive, process, or 24    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 25    until the provider has been notified of the error.26        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois   SB2797- 24 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    Department initiates the monthly billing process.2        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 3    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 4    when local government funds finance federal participation 5    for claims payments. 6    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 7a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 8filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 9applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 10Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 11to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 12adjudication by the primary payer.13    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 14calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 15prescreening information, new admissions with associated 16admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 17Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 18Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 19directly to the Department of Human Services using required 20admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 21documents, including all prescreening information, must be 22submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 23to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to 24verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 25been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 26rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after   SB2797- 25 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1the admission transaction has been completed.2    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 3with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 4payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 5shall have no liability for payment of those claims.6    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 7privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 8agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 9access to confidential and other information and data 10necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 11other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 12limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 13certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 14reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 15employment; supplemental security income; social security 16numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 17National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 18exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 19corporate information; and death records.20    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 21State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 22into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 23which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary 24for medical assistance program integrity functions and 25oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 26cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in   SB2797- 26 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 2appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 3minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 4the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 5agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 6agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 7but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 8Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 9Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation.11    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 12shall set forth a request for information to identify the 13benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 14claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 15and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 16rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 17adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 18data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 19clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 20post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 21management system with link analysis. Such a request for 22information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 23or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to 24take any action or acquire any products or services. 25    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 26procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the   SB2797- 27 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 2devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 3provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 4immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 5and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 6medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 7consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 8the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 9maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 10rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 11alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 12or replacements of any device or equipment previously 13authorized for such recipient by the Department. 14Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 15the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 16wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 17wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 18and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 19methods other than actual acquisition costs.20    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 21durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 22organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 23Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to 24bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 25recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 26of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers   SB2797- 28 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1must meet the accreditation requirement.2    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 3needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 4cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 5under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 6managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 7of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 8equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 9orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 10Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 11products and associated services) through the State's 12assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 13staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 14Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 15(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 16costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 17(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 18cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 19federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 20governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 21settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 22enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 23recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or 24similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 25refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 26of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall   SB2797- 29 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 2new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 3authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 4organizations. 5    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 6prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 7Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 8effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 9eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 10non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 11development of non-institutional services in areas of the 12State where they are not currently available or are 13undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 14law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 15increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 1637 for applicants for institutional and home and 17community-based long term care; if and only if federal 18approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 19with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 20or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 21amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 222013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 23institutional and home and community-based long term care; and 24(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 25permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 26for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or   SB2797- 30 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 2to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 3Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 4agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 5institutional and home and community-based long term care 6interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 7implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 8community-based services in circumstances where federal 9approval has been granted. 10    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 11cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 12compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 13appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 14and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 15services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 16medical assistance under this Code. 17    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 18General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 191979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 20        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 21    medical services by public aid recipients; 22        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 23    the various medical services by medical vendors; 24        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 25    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 26        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the   SB2797- 31 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    Illinois Department. 2    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 3ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 4include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 5Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 6Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 7required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 8Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 9Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 10as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 11Library Act. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 19rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 20any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 21of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 22with Section 5-5e. 23    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate, 24cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 25necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 26of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall   SB2797- 32 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 2renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 3benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 4of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 5requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 6under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 7kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 8emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 9Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 10certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 11and the services under this Section shall be limited to 12services associated with kidney transplantation. 13    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 14contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved forms of 15medication assisted treatment prescribed for the treatment of 16alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid dependence shall be 17covered under both fee-for-service and managed care medical 18assistance programs for persons who are otherwise eligible for 19medical assistance under this Article and shall not be subject 20to any (1) utilization control, other than those established 21under the American Society of Addiction Medicine patient 22placement criteria, (2) prior authorization mandate, (3) 23lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) limitations on 24dosage. 25    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 26for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the   SB2797- 33 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 2fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 3and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 4under the medical assistance program for persons who are 5otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 6As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 7binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 8opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 9to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 10approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 11Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 12provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 13assistance program.14    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 15coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 16marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 17are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 18United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 19pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 20services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 21transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 22transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 23counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among 24individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 25risk of HIV infection.26    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section   SB2797- 34 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b11905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 2reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 3qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 4to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 5dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 6Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 7dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 8    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 9of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 10approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 11family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 12to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 13poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 14beginning no later than December 1, 2022.15    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 16and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 17electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 18(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 19I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 20Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 21(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 22the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 23become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program, 24subject to criteria established in accordance with all 25applicable laws.26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code,   SB2797- 35 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 2interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 3assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 4Palliative Care Act.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 612 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 7102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 8services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 9Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 10or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 11program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 12State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 13paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 14standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 16medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 17reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 18screening test for the presence of metachromatic 19leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 20Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 21Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 22provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 23subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse 24hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 25tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 26Public Act 103-909) to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and   SB2797- 36 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1required to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than 2the fee charged by the Department of Public Health. The 3Department shall seek federal approval before the 4implementation of the newborn screening test fees by the 5Department of Public Health. 6    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 7beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 8cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 9person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 10impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 11Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 12under the medical assistance program for persons who are 13otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 15medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 16to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 17medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 18eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 19this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 20performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 21restore physical appearance. 22    Subject to federal approval, for dates of services on and 23after January 1, 2026, over-the-counter choline dietary 24supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered under the 25medical assistance program. 26(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 1-1-24;   SB2797- 37 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 21-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 3Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 90, 4Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-909, eff. 58-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-9, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, 6eff. 8-15-25.) 7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)8    Sec. 5-5. Medical services. The Illinois Department, by 9rule, shall determine the quantity and quality of and the rate 10of reimbursement for the medical assistance for which payment 11will be authorized, and the medical services to be provided, 12which may include all or part of the following: (1) inpatient 13hospital services; (2) outpatient hospital services; (3) other 14laboratory and X-ray services; (4) skilled nursing home 15services; (5) physicians' services whether furnished in the 16office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing 17home, or elsewhere; (6) medical care, or any other type of 18remedial care furnished by licensed practitioners; (7) home 19health care services; (8) private duty nursing service; (9) 20clinic services; (10) dental services, including prevention 21and treatment of periodontal disease and dental caries disease 22for pregnant individuals, provided by an individual licensed 23to practice dentistry or dental surgery; for purposes of this 24item (10), "dental services" means diagnostic, preventive, or 25corrective procedures provided by or under the supervision of   SB2797- 38 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1a dentist in the practice of his or her profession; (11) 2physical therapy and related services; (12) prescribed drugs, 3dentures, and prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by 4a physician skilled in the diseases of the eye, or by an 5optometrist, whichever the person may select; (13) other 6diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative 7services, including to ensure that the individual's need for 8intervention or treatment of mental disorders or substance use 9disorders or co-occurring mental health and substance use 10disorders is determined using a uniform screening, assessment, 11and evaluation process inclusive of criteria, for children and 12adults; for purposes of this item (13), a uniform screening, 13assessment, and evaluation process refers to a process that 14includes an appropriate evaluation and, as warranted, a 15referral; "uniform" does not mean the use of a singular 16instrument, tool, or process that all must utilize; (14) 17transportation and such other expenses as may be necessary; 18(15) medical treatment of sexual assault survivors, as defined 19in Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 20Treatment Act, for injuries sustained as a result of the 21sexual assault, including examinations and laboratory tests to 22discover evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings 23arising from the sexual assault; (16) the diagnosis and 24treatment of sickle cell anemia; (16.5) services performed by 25a chiropractic physician licensed under the Medical Practice 26Act of 1987 and acting within the scope of his or her license,   SB2797- 39 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1including, but not limited to, chiropractic manipulative 2treatment; and (17) any other medical care, and any other type 3of remedial care recognized under the laws of this State. The 4term "any other type of remedial care" shall include nursing 5care and nursing home service for persons who rely on 6treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer for healing. 7    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, a 8comprehensive tobacco use cessation program that includes 9purchasing prescription drugs or prescription medical devices 10approved by the Food and Drug Administration shall be covered 11under the medical assistance program under this Article for 12persons who are otherwise eligible for assistance under this 13Article. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 15reproductive health care that is otherwise legal in Illinois 16shall be covered under the medical assistance program for 17persons who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance 18under this Article. 19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, all 20tobacco cessation medications approved by the United States 21Food and Drug Administration and all individual and group 22tobacco cessation counseling services and telephone-based 23counseling services and tobacco cessation medications provided 24through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline shall be covered under 25the medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 26eligible for assistance under this Article. The Department   SB2797- 40 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1shall comply with all federal requirements necessary to obtain 2federal financial participation, as specified in 42 CFR 3433.15(b)(7), for telephone-based counseling services provided 4through the Illinois Tobacco Quitline, including, but not 5limited to: (i) entering into a memorandum of understanding or 6interagency agreement with the Department of Public Health, as 7administrator of the Illinois Tobacco Quitline; and (ii) 8developing a cost allocation plan for Medicaid-allowable 9Illinois Tobacco Quitline services in accordance with 45 CFR 1095.507. The Department shall submit the memorandum of 11understanding or interagency agreement, the cost allocation 12plan, and all other necessary documentation to the Centers for 13Medicare and Medicaid Services for review and approval. 14Coverage under this paragraph shall be contingent upon federal 15approval.16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 17Illinois Department may not require, as a condition of payment 18for any laboratory test authorized under this Article, that a 19physician's handwritten signature appear on the laboratory 20test order form. The Illinois Department may, however, impose 21other appropriate requirements regarding laboratory test order 22documentation. 23    Upon receipt of federal approval of an amendment to the 24Illinois Title XIX State Plan for this purpose, the Department 25shall authorize the Chicago Public Schools (CPS) to procure a 26vendor or vendors to manufacture eyeglasses for individuals   SB2797- 41 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1enrolled in a school within the CPS system. CPS shall ensure 2that its vendor or vendors are enrolled as providers in the 3medical assistance program and in any capitated Medicaid 4managed care entity (MCE) serving individuals enrolled in a 5school within the CPS system. Under any contract procured 6under this provision, the vendor or vendors must serve only 7individuals enrolled in a school within the CPS system. Claims 8for services provided by CPS's vendor or vendors to recipients 9of benefits in the medical assistance program under this Code, 10the Children's Health Insurance Program, or the Covering ALL 11KIDS Health Insurance Program shall be submitted to the 12Department or the MCE in which the individual is enrolled for 13payment and shall be reimbursed at the Department's or the 14MCE's established rates or rate methodologies for eyeglasses. 15    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Healthcare 16and Family Services may provide the following services to 17persons eligible for assistance under this Article who are 18participating in education, training or employment programs 19operated by the Department of Human Services as successor to 20the Department of Public Aid:21        (1) dental services provided by or under the 22    supervision of a dentist; and 23        (2) eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in 24    the diseases of the eye, or by an optometrist, whichever 25    the person may select.26    On and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Healthcare   SB2797- 42 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1and Family Services shall provide dental services to any adult 2who is otherwise eligible for assistance under the medical 3assistance program. As used in this paragraph, "dental 4services" means diagnostic, preventative, restorative, or 5corrective procedures, including procedures and services for 6the prevention and treatment of periodontal disease and dental 7caries disease, provided by an individual who is licensed to 8practice dentistry or dental surgery or who is under the 9supervision of a dentist in the practice of his or her 10profession.11    On and after July 1, 2018, targeted dental services, as 12set forth in Exhibit D of the Consent Decree entered by the 13United States District Court for the Northern District of 14Illinois, Eastern Division, in the matter of Memisovski v. 15Maram, Case No. 92 C 1982, that are provided to adults under 16the medical assistance program shall be established at no less 17than the rates set forth in the "New Rate" column in Exhibit D 18of the Consent Decree for targeted dental services that are 19provided to persons under the age of 18 under the medical 20assistance program. 21    Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, 22the rates paid for sedation evaluation and the provision of 23deep sedation and intravenous sedation for the purpose of 24dental services shall be increased by 33% above the rates in 25effect on December 31, 2024. The rates paid for nitrous oxide 26sedation shall not be impacted by this paragraph and shall   SB2797- 43 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1remain the same as the rates in effect on December 31, 2024. 2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code and 3subject to federal approval, the Department may adopt rules to 4allow a dentist who is volunteering his or her service at no 5cost to render dental services through an enrolled 6not-for-profit health clinic without the dentist personally 7enrolling as a participating provider in the medical 8assistance program. A not-for-profit health clinic shall 9include a public health clinic or Federally Qualified Health 10Center or other enrolled provider, as determined by the 11Department, through which dental services covered under this 12Section are performed. The Department shall establish a 13process for payment of claims for reimbursement for covered 14dental services rendered under this provision. 15    Subject to appropriation and to federal approval, the 16Department shall file administrative rules updating the 17Handicapping Labio-Lingual Deviation orthodontic scoring tool 18by January 1, 2025, or as soon as practicable. 19    On and after January 1, 2022, the Department of Healthcare 20and Family Services shall administer and regulate a 21school-based dental program that allows for the out-of-office 22delivery of preventative dental services in a school setting 23to children under 19 years of age. The Department shall 24establish, by rule, guidelines for participation by providers 25and set requirements for follow-up referral care based on the 26requirements established in the Dental Office Reference Manual   SB2797- 44 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1published by the Department that establishes the requirements 2for dentists participating in the All Kids Dental School 3Program. Every effort shall be made by the Department when 4developing the program requirements to consider the different 5geographic differences of both urban and rural areas of the 6State for initial treatment and necessary follow-up care. No 7provider shall be charged a fee by any unit of local government 8to participate in the school-based dental program administered 9by the Department. When developing the program requirements 10for the All Kids Dental School Program, the Department shall 11ensure that the following components are included: 12        (1) All dentists must be enrolled as a participating 13    dentist in the Department's provider enrollment system 14    within the Illinois Medicaid Program Advanced Cloud 15    Technology System.16        (2) Each dental entity must complete the All Kids 17    School-Based Dental Program Provider Registration 18    Application.19        (3) All dental providers approved must be able to 20    render the full scope of preventative school-based 21    services for an out-of-office setting as determined by the 22    Department, including a Caries Risk Assessment for each 23    student, in order to receive payment.24        (4) Each dental entity must provide a copy of the 25    Illinois Department of Public Health Proof of School 26    Dental Exam Form to each participating school, as   SB2797- 45 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    appropriate.2        (5) A School Exam Follow-Up form shall be completed by 3    each dental provider and given to each student regarding 4    the student's oral health needs and follow-up care.5        (6) Each dental entity must complete a referral plan 6    for each location where school-based dental services are 7    provided.8        (7) Each dental entity must complete and maintain a 9    dental record for each student receiving school-based 10    services.11        (8) Each dental entity approved must obtain a signed 12    consent form from each student's parent or guardian prior 13    to providing services.14        (9) Once a year a site visit may be conducted by a 15    licensed Illinois dentist on behalf of the Department to 16    ensure clinical care is being provided per the program 17    guidelines.18    The Department shall coordinate with the Chicago Public 19Schools on which schools will participate in the school-based 20dental program and then oversee the allocation of schools in 21the metropolitan Chicago area. The Department shall review 22notarized applications from dentists wishing to participate in 23the CPS school-based sealant program and allocate schools to 24approved dental providers based on criteria prescribed by the 25Department that must include the following: Schools must be 26assigned to dental providers on a first-come, first-served   SB2797- 46 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1basis or put on a wait list if no schools are available at that 2time. No more than 80 schools per provider shall be allowed. 3Providers may subcontract with other approved providers to 4render services. Once assigned, schools or providers may opt 5out at any given time with those returned schools pooled in 6order to be reassigned to an approved provider.7    Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit or 8preempt a home rule unit's or school district's authority to 9establish, change, or administer a school-based dental program 10in addition to, or independent of, the school-based dental 11program administered by the Department. 12    The Illinois Department, by rule, may distinguish and 13classify the medical services to be provided only in 14accordance with the classes of persons designated in Section 155-2. 16    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services must 17provide coverage and reimbursement for amino acid-based 18elemental formulas, regardless of delivery method, for the 19diagnosis and treatment of (i) eosinophilic disorders and (ii) 20short bowel syndrome when the prescribing physician has issued 21a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental 22formula is medically necessary. 23    The Illinois Department shall authorize the provision of, 24and shall authorize payment for, screening by low-dose 25mammography for the presence of occult breast cancer for 26individuals 35 years of age or older who are eligible for   SB2797- 47 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1medical assistance under this Article, as follows:2        (A) A baseline mammogram for individuals 35 to 39 3    years of age. 4        (B) An annual mammogram for individuals 40 years of 5    age or older.6        (C) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 7    medically necessary by the individual's health care 8    provider for individuals under 40 years of age and having 9    a family history of breast cancer, prior personal history 10    of breast cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk 11    factors.12        (D) A comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of an 13    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 14    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 15    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 16    practice medicine in all of its branches. 17        (E) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 18    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 19    all of its branches. 20        (F) A diagnostic mammogram when medically necessary, 21    as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine 22    in all its branches, advanced practice registered nurse, 23    or physician assistant. 24        (G) Molecular breast imaging (MBI) and MRI of an 25    entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 26    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically   SB2797- 48 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 2    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 3    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 4    The Department shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, 5copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the 6coverage provided under this paragraph; except that this 7sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 8to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 9health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 10pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 11U.S.C. 223). 12    All screenings shall include a physical breast exam, 13instruction on self-examination and information regarding the 14frequency of self-examination and its value as a preventative 15tool.16    For purposes of this Section:17    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 18diagnostic mammography.19    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that 20is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 21an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 22subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 23breast.24    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 25breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 26including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and   SB2797- 49 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1image receptor, with an average radiation exposure delivery of 2less than one rad per breast for 2 views of an average size 3breast. The term also includes digital mammography and 4includes breast tomosynthesis.5    "Breast tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that 6involves the acquisition of projection images over the 7stationary breast to produce cross-sectional digital 8three-dimensional images of the breast.9    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 10Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 11agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 12the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 13Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 14would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 15Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 16111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 1718031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 18of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 19paragraph, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast 20tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 21authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 22U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 23for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 24this paragraph.25    On and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall ensure 26that all networks of care for adult clients of the Department   SB2797- 50 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1include access to at least one breast imaging Center of 2Imaging Excellence as certified by the American College of 3Radiology.4    On and after January 1, 2012, providers participating in a 5quality improvement program approved by the Department shall 6be reimbursed for screening and diagnostic mammography at the 7same rate as the Medicare program's rates, including the 8increased reimbursement for digital mammography and, after 9January 1, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1018), 10breast tomosynthesis.11    The Department shall convene an expert panel including 12representatives of hospitals, free-standing mammography 13facilities, and doctors, including radiologists, to establish 14quality standards for mammography.15    On and after January 1, 2017, providers participating in a 16breast cancer treatment quality improvement program approved 17by the Department shall be reimbursed for breast cancer 18treatment at a rate that is no lower than 95% of the Medicare 19program's rates for the data elements included in the breast 20cancer treatment quality program.21    The Department shall convene an expert panel, including 22representatives of hospitals, free-standing breast cancer 23treatment centers, breast cancer quality organizations, and 24doctors, including radiologists that are trained in all forms 25of FDA-approved breast imaging technologies, breast surgeons, 26reconstructive breast surgeons, oncologists, and primary care   SB2797- 51 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1providers to establish quality standards for breast cancer 2treatment.3    Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 4establish a rate methodology for mammography at federally 5qualified health centers and other encounter-rate clinics. 6These clinics or centers may also collaborate with other 7hospital-based mammography facilities. By January 1, 2016, the 8Department shall report to the General Assembly on the status 9of the provision set forth in this paragraph.10    The Department shall establish a methodology to remind 11individuals who are age-appropriate for screening mammography, 12but who have not received a mammogram within the previous 18 13months, of the importance and benefit of screening 14mammography. The Department shall work with experts in breast 15cancer outreach and patient navigation to optimize these 16reminders and shall establish a methodology for evaluating 17their effectiveness and modifying the methodology based on the 18evaluation.19    The Department shall establish a performance goal for 20primary care providers with respect to their female patients 21over age 40 receiving an annual mammogram. This performance 22goal shall be used to provide additional reimbursement in the 23form of a quality performance bonus to primary care providers 24who meet that goal.25    The Department shall devise a means of case-managing or 26patient navigation for beneficiaries diagnosed with breast   SB2797- 52 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1cancer. This program shall initially operate as a pilot 2program in areas of the State with the highest incidence of 3mortality related to breast cancer. At least one pilot program 4site shall be in the metropolitan Chicago area and at least one 5site shall be outside the metropolitan Chicago area. On or 6after July 1, 2016, the pilot program shall be expanded to 7include one site in western Illinois, one site in southern 8Illinois, one site in central Illinois, and 4 sites within 9metropolitan Chicago. An evaluation of the pilot program shall 10be carried out measuring health outcomes and cost of care for 11those served by the pilot program compared to similarly 12situated patients who are not served by the pilot program. 13    The Department shall require all networks of care to 14develop a means either internally or by contract with experts 15in navigation and community outreach to navigate cancer 16patients to comprehensive care in a timely fashion. The 17Department shall require all networks of care to include 18access for patients diagnosed with cancer to at least one 19academic commission on cancer-accredited cancer program as an 20in-network covered benefit.21    The Department shall provide coverage and reimbursement 22for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine that is approved for 23marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration for all 24persons between the ages of 9 and 45. Subject to federal 25approval, the Department shall provide coverage and 26reimbursement for a human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine for   SB2797- 53 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1persons of the age of 46 and above who have been diagnosed with 2cervical dysplasia with a high risk of recurrence or 3progression. The Department shall disallow any 4preauthorization requirements for the administration of the 5human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. 6    On or after July 1, 2022, individuals who are otherwise 7eligible for medical assistance under this Article shall 8receive coverage for perinatal depression screenings for the 912-month period beginning on the last day of their pregnancy. 10Medical assistance coverage under this paragraph shall be 11conditioned on the use of a screening instrument approved by 12the Department.13    Any medical or health care provider shall immediately 14recommend, to any pregnant individual who is being provided 15prenatal services and is suspected of having a substance use 16disorder as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 17referral to a local substance use disorder treatment program 18licensed by the Department of Human Services or to a licensed 19hospital which provides substance abuse treatment services. 20The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall assure 21coverage for the cost of treatment of the drug abuse or 22addiction for pregnant recipients in accordance with the 23Illinois Medicaid Program in conjunction with the Department 24of Human Services. 25    All medical providers providing medical assistance to 26pregnant individuals under this Code shall receive information   SB2797- 54 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1from the Department on the availability of services under any 2program providing case management services for addicted 3individuals, including information on appropriate referrals 4for other social services that may be needed by addicted 5individuals in addition to treatment for addiction. 6    The Illinois Department, in cooperation with the 7Departments of Human Services (as successor to the Department 8of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse) and Public Health, through 9a public awareness campaign, may provide information 10concerning treatment for alcoholism and drug abuse and 11addiction, prenatal health care, and other pertinent programs 12directed at reducing the number of drug-affected infants born 13to recipients of medical assistance. 14    Neither the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 15nor the Department of Human Services shall sanction the 16recipient solely on the basis of the recipient's substance 17abuse. 18    The Illinois Department shall establish such regulations 19governing the dispensing of health services under this Article 20as it shall deem appropriate. The Department should seek the 21advice of formal professional advisory committees appointed by 22the Director of the Illinois Department for the purpose of 23providing regular advice on policy and administrative matters, 24information dissemination and educational activities for 25medical and health care providers, and consistency in 26procedures to the Illinois Department.   SB2797- 55 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    The Illinois Department may develop and contract with 2Partnerships of medical providers to arrange medical services 3for persons eligible under Section 5-2 of this Code. 4Implementation of this Section may be by demonstration 5projects in certain geographic areas. The Partnership shall be 6represented by a sponsor organization. The Department, by 7rule, shall develop qualifications for sponsors of 8Partnerships. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 9require that the sponsor organization be a medical 10organization. 11    The sponsor must negotiate formal written contracts with 12medical providers for physician services, inpatient and 13outpatient hospital care, home health services, treatment for 14alcoholism and substance abuse, and other services determined 15necessary by the Illinois Department by rule for delivery by 16Partnerships. Physician services must include prenatal and 17obstetrical care. The Illinois Department shall reimburse 18medical services delivered by Partnership providers to clients 19in target areas according to provisions of this Article and 20the Illinois Health Finance Reform Act, except that: 21        (1) Physicians participating in a Partnership and 22    providing certain services, which shall be determined by 23    the Illinois Department, to persons in areas covered by 24    the Partnership may receive an additional surcharge for 25    such services. 26        (2) The Department may elect to consider and negotiate   SB2797- 56 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    financial incentives to encourage the development of 2    Partnerships and the efficient delivery of medical care. 3        (3) Persons receiving medical services through 4    Partnerships may receive medical and case management 5    services above the level usually offered through the 6    medical assistance program. 7    Medical providers shall be required to meet certain 8qualifications to participate in Partnerships to ensure the 9delivery of high quality medical services. These 10qualifications shall be determined by rule of the Illinois 11Department and may be higher than qualifications for 12participation in the medical assistance program. Partnership 13sponsors may prescribe reasonable additional qualifications 14for participation by medical providers, only with the prior 15written approval of the Illinois Department. 16    Nothing in this Section shall limit the free choice of 17practitioners, hospitals, and other providers of medical 18services by clients. In order to ensure patient freedom of 19choice, the Illinois Department shall immediately promulgate 20all rules and take all other necessary actions so that 21provided services may be accessed from therapeutically 22certified optometrists to the full extent of the Illinois 23Optometric Practice Act of 1987 without discriminating between 24service providers. 25    The Department shall apply for a waiver from the United 26States Health Care Financing Administration to allow for the   SB2797- 57 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1implementation of Partnerships under this Section. 2    The Illinois Department shall require health care 3providers to maintain records that document the medical care 4and services provided to recipients of Medical Assistance 5under this Article. Such records must be retained for a period 6of not less than 6 years from the date of service or as 7provided by applicable State law, whichever period is longer, 8except that if an audit is initiated within the required 9retention period then the records must be retained until the 10audit is completed and every exception is resolved. The 11Illinois Department shall require health care providers to 12make available, when authorized by the patient, in writing, 13the medical records in a timely fashion to other health care 14providers who are treating or serving persons eligible for 15Medical Assistance under this Article. All dispensers of 16medical services shall be required to maintain and retain 17business and professional records sufficient to fully and 18accurately document the nature, scope, details and receipt of 19the health care provided to persons eligible for medical 20assistance under this Code, in accordance with regulations 21promulgated by the Illinois Department. The rules and 22regulations shall require that proof of the receipt of 23prescription drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and 24eyeglasses by eligible persons under this Section accompany 25each claim for reimbursement submitted by the dispenser of 26such medical services. No such claims for reimbursement shall   SB2797- 58 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1be approved for payment by the Illinois Department without 2such proof of receipt, unless the Illinois Department shall 3have put into effect and shall be operating a system of 4post-payment audit and review which shall, on a sampling 5basis, be deemed adequate by the Illinois Department to assure 6that such drugs, dentures, prosthetic devices and eyeglasses 7for which payment is being made are actually being received by 8eligible recipients. Within 90 days after September 16, 1984 9(the effective date of Public Act 83-1439), the Illinois 10Department shall establish a current list of acquisition costs 11for all prosthetic devices and any other items recognized as 12medical equipment and supplies reimbursable under this Article 13and shall update such list on a quarterly basis, except that 14the acquisition costs of all prescription drugs shall be 15updated no less frequently than every 30 days as required by 16Section 5-5.12. 17    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 18Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after July 22, 2013 19(the effective date of Public Act 98-104), establish 20procedures to permit skilled care facilities licensed under 21the Nursing Home Care Act to submit monthly billing claims for 22reimbursement purposes. Following development of these 23procedures, the Department shall, by July 1, 2016, test the 24viability of the new system and implement any necessary 25operational or structural changes to its information 26technology platforms in order to allow for the direct   SB2797- 59 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1acceptance and payment of nursing home claims. 2    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 3Illinois Department shall, within 365 days after August 15, 42014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-963), establish 5procedures to permit ID/DD facilities licensed under the ID/DD 6Community Care Act and MC/DD facilities licensed under the 7MC/DD Act to submit monthly billing claims for reimbursement 8purposes. Following development of these procedures, the 9Department shall have an additional 365 days to test the 10viability of the new system and to ensure that any necessary 11operational or structural changes to its information 12technology platforms are implemented. 13    The Illinois Department shall require all dispensers of 14medical services, other than an individual practitioner or 15group of practitioners, desiring to participate in the Medical 16Assistance program established under this Article to disclose 17all financial, beneficial, ownership, equity, surety or other 18interests in any and all firms, corporations, partnerships, 19associations, business enterprises, joint ventures, agencies, 20institutions or other legal entities providing any form of 21health care services in this State under this Article. 22    The Illinois Department may require that all dispensers of 23medical services desiring to participate in the medical 24assistance program established under this Article disclose, 25under such terms and conditions as the Illinois Department may 26by rule establish, all inquiries from clients and attorneys   SB2797- 60 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1regarding medical bills paid by the Illinois Department, which 2inquiries could indicate potential existence of claims or 3liens for the Illinois Department. 4    Enrollment of a vendor shall be subject to a provisional 5period and shall be conditional for one year. During the 6period of conditional enrollment, the Department may terminate 7the vendor's eligibility to participate in, or may disenroll 8the vendor from, the medical assistance program without cause. 9Unless otherwise specified, such termination of eligibility or 10disenrollment is not subject to the Department's hearing 11process. However, a disenrolled vendor may reapply without 12penalty. 13    The Department has the discretion to limit the conditional 14enrollment period for vendors based upon the category of risk 15of the vendor.16    Prior to enrollment and during the conditional enrollment 17period in the medical assistance program, all vendors shall be 18subject to enhanced oversight, screening, and review based on 19the risk of fraud, waste, and abuse that is posed by the 20category of risk of the vendor. The Illinois Department shall 21establish the procedures for oversight, screening, and review, 22which may include, but need not be limited to: criminal and 23financial background checks; fingerprinting; license, 24certification, and authorization verifications; unscheduled or 25unannounced site visits; database checks; prepayment audit 26reviews; audits; payment caps; payment suspensions; and other   SB2797- 61 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1screening as required by federal or State law.2    The Department shall define or specify the following: (i) 3by provider notice, the "category of risk of the vendor" for 4each type of vendor, which shall take into account the level of 5screening applicable to a particular category of vendor under 6federal law and regulations; (ii) by rule or provider notice, 7the maximum length of the conditional enrollment period for 8each category of risk of the vendor; and (iii) by rule, the 9hearing rights, if any, afforded to a vendor in each category 10of risk of the vendor that is terminated or disenrolled during 11the conditional enrollment period. 12    To be eligible for payment consideration, a vendor's 13payment claim or bill, either as an initial claim or as a 14resubmitted claim following prior rejection, must be received 15by the Illinois Department, or its fiscal intermediary, no 16later than 180 days after the latest date on the claim on which 17medical goods or services were provided, with the following 18exceptions:19        (1) In the case of a provider whose enrollment is in 20    process by the Illinois Department, the 180-day period 21    shall not begin until the date on the written notice from 22    the Illinois Department that the provider enrollment is 23    complete.24        (2) In the case of errors attributable to the Illinois 25    Department or any of its claims processing intermediaries 26    which result in an inability to receive, process, or   SB2797- 62 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1    adjudicate a claim, the 180-day period shall not begin 2    until the provider has been notified of the error.3        (3) In the case of a provider for whom the Illinois 4    Department initiates the monthly billing process.5        (4) In the case of a provider operated by a unit of 6    local government with a population exceeding 3,000,000 7    when local government funds finance federal participation 8    for claims payments. 9    For claims for services rendered during a period for which 10a recipient received retroactive eligibility, claims must be 11filed within 180 days after the Department determines the 12applicant is eligible. For claims for which the Illinois 13Department is not the primary payer, claims must be submitted 14to the Illinois Department within 180 days after the final 15adjudication by the primary payer.16    In the case of long term care facilities, within 120 17calendar days of receipt by the facility of required 18prescreening information, new admissions with associated 19admission documents shall be submitted through the Medical 20Electronic Data Interchange (MEDI) or the Recipient 21Eligibility Verification (REV) System or shall be submitted 22directly to the Department of Human Services using required 23admission forms. Effective September 1, 2014, admission 24documents, including all prescreening information, must be 25submitted through MEDI or REV. Confirmation numbers assigned 26to an accepted transaction shall be retained by a facility to   SB2797- 63 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1verify timely submittal. Once an admission transaction has 2been completed, all resubmitted claims following prior 3rejection are subject to receipt no later than 180 days after 4the admission transaction has been completed.5    Claims that are not submitted and received in compliance 6with the foregoing requirements shall not be eligible for 7payment under the medical assistance program, and the State 8shall have no liability for payment of those claims.9    To the extent consistent with applicable information and 10privacy, security, and disclosure laws, State and federal 11agencies and departments shall provide the Illinois Department 12access to confidential and other information and data 13necessary to perform eligibility and payment verifications and 14other Illinois Department functions. This includes, but is not 15limited to: information pertaining to licensure; 16certification; earnings; immigration status; citizenship; wage 17reporting; unearned and earned income; pension income; 18employment; supplemental security income; social security 19numbers; National Provider Identifier (NPI) numbers; the 20National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB); program and agency 21exclusions; taxpayer identification numbers; tax delinquency; 22corporate information; and death records.23    The Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with 24State agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter 25into agreements with federal agencies and departments, under 26which such agencies and departments shall share data necessary   SB2797- 64 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1for medical assistance program integrity functions and 2oversight. The Illinois Department shall develop, in 3cooperation with other State departments and agencies, and in 4compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 5appropriate and effective methods to share such data. At a 6minimum, and to the extent necessary to provide data sharing, 7the Illinois Department shall enter into agreements with State 8agencies and departments, and is authorized to enter into 9agreements with federal agencies and departments, including, 10but not limited to: the Secretary of State; the Department of 11Revenue; the Department of Public Health; the Department of 12Human Services; and the Department of Financial and 13Professional Regulation.14    Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the Illinois Department 15shall set forth a request for information to identify the 16benefits of a pre-payment, post-adjudication, and post-edit 17claims system with the goals of streamlining claims processing 18and provider reimbursement, reducing the number of pending or 19rejected claims, and helping to ensure a more transparent 20adjudication process through the utilization of: (i) provider 21data verification and provider screening technology; and (ii) 22clinical code editing; and (iii) pre-pay, pre-adjudicated, or 23post-adjudicated predictive modeling with an integrated case 24management system with link analysis. Such a request for 25information shall not be considered as a request for proposal 26or as an obligation on the part of the Illinois Department to   SB2797- 65 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1take any action or acquire any products or services. 2    The Illinois Department shall establish policies, 3procedures, standards and criteria by rule for the 4acquisition, repair and replacement of orthotic and prosthetic 5devices and durable medical equipment. Such rules shall 6provide, but not be limited to, the following services: (1) 7immediate repair or replacement of such devices by recipients; 8and (2) rental, lease, purchase or lease-purchase of durable 9medical equipment in a cost-effective manner, taking into 10consideration the recipient's medical prognosis, the extent of 11the recipient's needs, and the requirements and costs for 12maintaining such equipment. Subject to prior approval, such 13rules shall enable a recipient to temporarily acquire and use 14alternative or substitute devices or equipment pending repairs 15or replacements of any device or equipment previously 16authorized for such recipient by the Department. 17Notwithstanding any provision of Section 5-5f to the contrary, 18the Department may, by rule, exempt certain replacement 19wheelchair parts from prior approval and, for wheelchairs, 20wheelchair parts, wheelchair accessories, and related seating 21and positioning items, determine the wholesale price by 22methods other than actual acquisition costs.23    The Department shall require, by rule, all providers of 24durable medical equipment to be accredited by an accreditation 25organization approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and 26Medicaid Services and recognized by the Department in order to   SB2797- 66 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1bill the Department for providing durable medical equipment to 2recipients. No later than 15 months after the effective date 3of the rule adopted pursuant to this paragraph, all providers 4must meet the accreditation requirement.5    In order to promote environmental responsibility, meet the 6needs of recipients and enrollees, and achieve significant 7cost savings, the Department, or a managed care organization 8under contract with the Department, may provide recipients or 9managed care enrollees who have a prescription or Certificate 10of Medical Necessity access to refurbished durable medical 11equipment under this Section (excluding prosthetic and 12orthotic devices as defined in the Orthotics, Prosthetics, and 13Pedorthics Practice Act and complex rehabilitation technology 14products and associated services) through the State's 15assistive technology program's reutilization program, using 16staff with the Assistive Technology Professional (ATP) 17Certification if the refurbished durable medical equipment: 18(i) is available; (ii) is less expensive, including shipping 19costs, than new durable medical equipment of the same type; 20(iii) is able to withstand at least 3 years of use; (iv) is 21cleaned, disinfected, sterilized, and safe in accordance with 22federal Food and Drug Administration regulations and guidance 23governing the reprocessing of medical devices in health care 24settings; and (v) equally meets the needs of the recipient or 25enrollee. The reutilization program shall confirm that the 26recipient or enrollee is not already in receipt of the same or   SB2797- 67 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1similar equipment from another service provider, and that the 2refurbished durable medical equipment equally meets the needs 3of the recipient or enrollee. Nothing in this paragraph shall 4be construed to limit recipient or enrollee choice to obtain 5new durable medical equipment or place any additional prior 6authorization conditions on enrollees of managed care 7organizations. 8    The Department shall execute, relative to the nursing home 9prescreening project, written inter-agency agreements with the 10Department of Human Services and the Department on Aging, to 11effect the following: (i) intake procedures and common 12eligibility criteria for those persons who are receiving 13non-institutional services; and (ii) the establishment and 14development of non-institutional services in areas of the 15State where they are not currently available or are 16undeveloped; and (iii) notwithstanding any other provision of 17law, subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2012, an 18increase in the determination of need (DON) scores from 29 to 1937 for applicants for institutional and home and 20community-based long term care; if and only if federal 21approval is not granted, the Department may, in conjunction 22with other affected agencies, implement utilization controls 23or changes in benefit packages to effectuate a similar savings 24amount for this population; and (iv) no later than July 1, 252013, minimum level of care eligibility criteria for 26institutional and home and community-based long term care; and   SB2797- 68 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1(v) no later than October 1, 2013, establish procedures to 2permit long term care providers access to eligibility scores 3for individuals with an admission date who are seeking or 4receiving services from the long term care provider. In order 5to select the minimum level of care eligibility criteria, the 6Governor shall establish a workgroup that includes affected 7agency representatives and stakeholders representing the 8institutional and home and community-based long term care 9interests. This Section shall not restrict the Department from 10implementing lower level of care eligibility criteria for 11community-based services in circumstances where federal 12approval has been granted. 13    The Illinois Department shall develop and operate, in 14cooperation with other State Departments and agencies and in 15compliance with applicable federal laws and regulations, 16appropriate and effective systems of health care evaluation 17and programs for monitoring of utilization of health care 18services and facilities, as it affects persons eligible for 19medical assistance under this Code. 20    The Illinois Department shall report annually to the 21General Assembly, no later than the second Friday in April of 221979 and each year thereafter, in regard to: 23        (a) actual statistics and trends in utilization of 24    medical services by public aid recipients; 25        (b) actual statistics and trends in the provision of 26    the various medical services by medical vendors;   SB2797- 69 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1        (c) current rate structures and proposed changes in 2    those rate structures for the various medical vendors; and 3        (d) efforts at utilization review and control by the 4    Illinois Department. 5    The period covered by each report shall be the 3 years 6ending on the June 30 prior to the report. The report shall 7include suggested legislation for consideration by the General 8Assembly. The requirement for reporting to the General 9Assembly shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as 10required by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization 11Act, and filing such additional copies with the State 12Government Report Distribution Center for the General Assembly 13as is required under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State 14Library Act. 15    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 16any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 17with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 18Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 19Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 20whatever reason, is unauthorized. 21    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 22rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 23any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 24of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 25with Section 5-5e. 26    Because kidney transplantation can be an appropriate,   SB2797- 70 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1cost-effective alternative to renal dialysis when medically 2necessary and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1-11 3of this Code, beginning October 1, 2014, the Department shall 4cover kidney transplantation for noncitizens with end-stage 5renal disease who are not eligible for comprehensive medical 6benefits, who meet the residency requirements of Section 5-3 7of this Code, and who would otherwise meet the financial 8requirements of the appropriate class of eligible persons 9under Section 5-2 of this Code. To qualify for coverage of 10kidney transplantation, such person must be receiving 11emergency renal dialysis services covered by the Department. 12Providers under this Section shall be prior approved and 13certified by the Department to perform kidney transplantation 14and the services under this Section shall be limited to 15services associated with kidney transplantation. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to the 17contrary, on or after July 1, 2015, all FDA-approved forms of 18medication assisted treatment prescribed for the treatment of 19alcohol dependence or treatment of opioid dependence shall be 20covered under both fee-for-service and managed care medical 21assistance programs for persons who are otherwise eligible for 22medical assistance under this Article and shall not be subject 23to any (1) utilization control, other than those established 24under the American Society of Addiction Medicine patient 25placement criteria, (2) prior authorization mandate, (3) 26lifetime restriction limit mandate, or (4) limitations on   SB2797- 71 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1dosage. 2    On or after July 1, 2015, opioid antagonists prescribed 3for the treatment of an opioid overdose, including the 4medication product, administration devices, and any pharmacy 5fees or hospital fees related to the dispensing, distribution, 6and administration of the opioid antagonist, shall be covered 7under the medical assistance program for persons who are 8otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 9As used in this Section, "opioid antagonist" means a drug that 10binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of 11opioids acting on those receptors, including, but not limited 12to, naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug 13approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. The 14Department shall not impose a copayment on the coverage 15provided for naloxone hydrochloride under the medical 16assistance program.17    Upon federal approval, the Department shall provide 18coverage and reimbursement for all drugs that are approved for 19marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that 20are recommended by the federal Public Health Service or the 21United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for 22pre-exposure prophylaxis and related pre-exposure prophylaxis 23services, including, but not limited to, HIV and sexually 24transmitted infection screening, treatment for sexually 25transmitted infections, medical monitoring, assorted labs, and 26counseling to reduce the likelihood of HIV infection among   SB2797- 72 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1individuals who are not infected with HIV but who are at high 2risk of HIV infection.3    A federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 41905(l)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, shall be 5reimbursed by the Department in accordance with the federally 6qualified health center's encounter rate for services provided 7to medical assistance recipients that are performed by a 8dental hygienist, as defined under the Illinois Dental 9Practice Act, working under the general supervision of a 10dentist and employed by a federally qualified health center. 11    Within 90 days after October 8, 2021 (the effective date 12of Public Act 102-665), the Department shall seek federal 13approval of a State Plan amendment to expand coverage for 14family planning services that includes presumptive eligibility 15to individuals whose income is at or below 208% of the federal 16poverty level. Coverage under this Section shall be effective 17beginning no later than December 1, 2022.18    Subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare 19and Medicaid Services of a Title XIX State Plan amendment 20electing the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly 21(PACE) as a State Medicaid option, as provided for by Subtitle 22I (commencing with Section 4801) of Title IV of the Balanced 23Budget Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-33) and Part 460 24(commencing with Section 460.2) of Subchapter E of Title 42 of 25the Code of Federal Regulations, PACE program services shall 26become a covered benefit of the medical assistance program,   SB2797- 73 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1subject to criteria established in accordance with all 2applicable laws.3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 4community-based pediatric palliative care from a trained 5interdisciplinary team shall be covered under the medical 6assistance program as provided in Section 15 of the Pediatric 7Palliative Care Act.8    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, within 912 months after June 2, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 10102-1037) and subject to federal approval, acupuncture 11services performed by an acupuncturist licensed under the 12Acupuncture Practice Act who is acting within the scope of his 13or her license shall be covered under the medical assistance 14program. The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 15State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 16paragraph. The Department may adopt any rules, including 17standards and criteria, necessary to implement this paragraph. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the 19medical assistance program shall, subject to federal approval, 20reimburse hospitals for costs associated with a newborn 21screening test for the presence of metachromatic 22leukodystrophy, as required under the Newborn Metabolic 23Screening Act, at a rate not less than the fee charged by the 24Department of Public Health. Notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Code, the medical assistance program shall, 26subject to appropriation and federal approval, also reimburse   SB2797- 74 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1hospitals for costs associated with all newborn screening 2tests added on and after August 9, 2024 (the effective date of 3Public Act 103-909) to the Newborn Metabolic Screening Act and 4required to be performed under that Act at a rate not less than 5the fee charged by the Department of Public Health. The 6Department shall seek federal approval before the 7implementation of the newborn screening test fees by the 8Department of Public Health. 9    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 10beginning on January 1, 2024, subject to federal approval, 11cognitive assessment and care planning services provided to a 12person who experiences signs or symptoms of cognitive 13impairment, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical 14Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, shall be covered 15under the medical assistance program for persons who are 16otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this Article. 17    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 18medically necessary reconstructive services that are intended 19to restore physical appearance shall be covered under the 20medical assistance program for persons who are otherwise 21eligible for medical assistance under this Article. As used in 22this paragraph, "reconstructive services" means treatments 23performed on structures of the body damaged by trauma to 24restore physical appearance. 25    Subject to federal approval, for dates of services on and 26after January 1, 2026, over-the-counter choline dietary   SB2797- 75 -LRB104 16894 KTG 30305 b1supplements for pregnant persons shall be covered under the 2medical assistance program. 3(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 1-1-24; 4103-102, Article 95, Section 95-15, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 51-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-368, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 6Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 90, 7Section 90-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-808, eff. 81-1-26; 103-909, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-9, 9eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 10    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 11changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 12that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 13represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 14not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 15made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 16Public Act. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.